Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.130

City jail prisoners may be compelled to work.

When a person has been sentenced by any municipal or district judge in this state to a term of imprisonment in a city jail, whether in default of payment of a fine or otherwise, such person may be compelled on each day of such term, except Sundays, to perform eight hours' labor upon the streets, public buildings, and grounds of such city.

[ 1987 c 202 s 144; Code 1881 s 2075; RRS s 10189.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.